Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-196
Board of Parole; quorum; decisions; record.

Three members of the Board of Parole shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting any official business. The decisions of the Board of Parole shall be by majority vote. The board shall keep a record of its acts and shall notify the Director of Correctional Services of its decisions relating to offenders who are or have been committed.

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 27, p. 3087;

Laws 1987, LB 603, § 4.